Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-1736.06
Property tax refund; procedure.

The following procedure shall apply when making a property tax refund:

(1)(a) Within thirty days of the entry of a final nonappealable order, an unprotested determination of a county assessor, an unappealed decision of a county board of equalization, or other final action requiring a refund of real or personal property taxes paid or, for property valued by the state, within thirty days of a recertification of value by the Property Tax Administrator pursuant to section 77-1775 or 77-1775.01, the county assessor shall determine the amount of refund due the person entitled to the refund, certify that amount to the county treasurer, and send a copy of such certification to the person entitled to the refund.

(b) Within thirty days from the date the county assessor certifies the amount of the refund, the county treasurer shall notify each political subdivision, including any school district receiving a distribution pursuant to section 79-1073 and any land bank receiving real property taxes pursuant to subdivision (3)(a) of section 18-3411, of its respective share of the refund, except that for any political subdivision whose share of the refund is two hundred dollars or less, the county board may waive this notice requirement, and that for any political subdivision whose share of the refund is one thousand dollars or less, the governing body of the political subdivision may waive this notice requirement by notifying the county treasurer in writing. Notification shall be by (i) first-class mail, postage prepaid, to the last-known address of record of the political subdivision or (ii) electronic means if requested in writing by the governing body of the political subdivision.

(c) The county treasurer shall pay the refund from funds in his or her possession belonging to any political subdivision, including any school district receiving a distribution pursuant to section 79-1073 and any land bank receiving real property taxes pursuant to subdivision (3)(a) of section 18-3411, which received any part of the tax or penalty being refunded. If sufficient funds are not available, the county treasurer shall register the refund or portion thereof which remains unpaid as a claim against such political subdivision and shall issue the person entitled to the refund a receipt for the registration of the claim;

(2) The refund of a tax or penalty or the receipt for the registration of a claim made or issued pursuant to this section shall be satisfied in full as soon as practicable. If a receipt for the registration of a claim is given:

(a) The governing body of the political subdivision shall make provisions in its next budget for the amount of such claim; or

(b) If mutually agreed to by the governing body of the political subdivision and the person holding the receipt, such receipt shall be applied to satisfy any tax levied or assessed by that political subdivision which becomes due from the person holding the receipt until the claim is satisfied in full;

(3) The county treasurer shall mail the refund or the receipt by first-class mail, postage prepaid, to the last-known address of the person entitled thereto. Multiple refunds to the same person may be combined into one refund. If a refund is not claimed by June 1 of the year following the year of mailing, the refund shall be canceled and the resultant amount credited to the various funds originally charged;

(4) When the refund involves property valued by the state, the Tax Commissioner shall be authorized to negotiate a settlement of the amount of the refund or claim due pursuant to this section on behalf of the political subdivision from which such refund or claim is due. Any political subdivision which does not agree with the settlement terms as negotiated may reject such terms, and the refund or claim due from the political subdivision then shall be satisfied as set forth in this section as if no such negotiation had occurred;

(5) In the event that the Legislature appropriates state funds to be disbursed for the purposes of satisfying all or any portion of any refund or claim, the Tax Commissioner shall order the county treasurer to disburse such refund amounts directly to the persons entitled to the refund in partial or total satisfaction of such persons' claims. The county treasurer shall disburse such amounts within forty-five days after receipt thereof;

(6) If all or any portion of the refund is reduced by way of settlement or forgiveness by the person entitled to the refund, the proportionate amount of the refund that was paid by an appropriation of state funds shall be reimbursed by the county treasurer to the State Treasurer within forty-five days after receipt of the settlement agreement or receipt of the forgiven refund. The amount so reimbursed shall be credited to the General Fund; and

(7) For any refund or claim due under this section, interest shall accrue on the unpaid balance at the rate of fourteen percent beginning thirty days after the date the county assessor certifies the amount of refund based upon the final nonappealable order or other action approving the refund.

Laws 1991, LB 829, § 15;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 138;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 111;

Laws 1993, LB 555, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 167;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 82;

Laws 2008, LB965, § 18;

Laws 2010, LB1070, § 3;

Laws 2013, LB97, § 19;

Laws 2016, LB1067, § 9;

Laws 2020, LB424, § 19;

Laws 2021, LB644, § 20;

Laws 2023, LB243, § 11;

Laws 2024, LB147, § 1.